New Jersey, session 222, A2429.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The corporation shall establish an education program to educate and provide information and assistance on the corporations reduced fare program, Access Link services, and other services available to persons with disabilities, senior citizens, and other individuals with mobility needs. b.    The education program shall: (1)   publish information on the corporations website and in pamphlets that are to be available on Access Link vehicles regarding the services provided by the corporation; (2)   hold information sessions at least once per month throughout the State.  The information sessions shall be held in locations that are accessible to persons with disabilities and the corporation shall ensure that Access Link or other services are available to provide transportation to and from the information sessions; (3)   conduct a public awareness campaign concerning the services provided by the corporation to make sure that the corporation is reaching as many mobility-dependent individuals as possible; and (4)   engage in such other activity as the executive director of the corporation deems appropriate to further the purposes of the education program. c.     In establishing and implementing the education program, the corporation shall coordinate its efforts with the Commissioner of Transportation in fulfillment of the commissioners duties pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1973, c.126 (C.27:1A-71). d.    On or before March 1 of each year, the corporation shall submit a report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature concerning the activities conducted pursuant to the education program. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day following enactment.